Hawaii statutes.
§612-11 Master list. (a) Each year
the clerk for each circuit shall compile a master list. The master list shall
consist of all voter registration lists for the circuit, which shall be
supplemented with other lists of persons residing in
the circuit, such as lists of taxpayers and licensed drivers.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, including section 235-116, the
lists used to compile the master list shall contain available identifying
information of the persons on the list, such as last name, first name, middle
initial, date of birth, gender, address, and social security number. Each person's name shall appear only once on the
master list.

(b) Whoever has custody, possession, or
control of any of the lists used in compiling the master list, shall make the
list available to the clerk for inspection, reproduction, and copying at all
reasonable times. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 366, §4; am L 2002, c
92, §2; am L 2007, c 122, §7]

Case Notes

The mere fact that the trial jurors drawn from the jury list
did not contain percentages of persons of nativity of the citizenry in the
court's jurisdiction did not show that the list itself violated the jury
statute. Violation occurs if there is systematic or arbitrary exclusion of or
discrimination between persons of a particular race. 118 F.2d 667 (1941).

Evidence disclosing that the employer entrepreneur group
comprised but about 3.6% of the population of the county but comprised 42% of
the grand jury list and that male laborers comprised approximately 79% of male
population of county but 12% of grand jury list established that an erroneous
method had been employed in selecting the grand jury list. 82 F. Supp. 65, 117
(1948), reversed on other grounds. 187 F.2d 860 (1951).

Proportional representation. 103 F. Supp. 1 (1952); 105 F.
Supp. 727 (1952).

Selection of jurors under earlier amendments. 17 H. 23
(1905); 18 H. 46 (1906); 22 H. 618 (1915).

Grand jury not incompetent through omission to apportion list
of persons from different precincts. 29 H. 7 (1926).

Denial of plea in bar and motion to dismiss indictment upon
ground selection was not made without reference to race, place of nativity, or
sex was not erroneous. 45 H. 247, 365 P.2d 460 (1961).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next